Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.260

Attorneys' fees as costs in damage actions of ten thousand dollars or less—When plaintiff deemed prevailing party.

The plaintiff, or party seeking relief, shall be deemed the prevailing party within the meaning of RCW 4.84.250 when the recovery, exclusive of costs, is as much as or more than the amount offered in settlement by the plaintiff, or party seeking relief, as set forth in RCW 4.84.280.

[ 1973 c 84 s 2.]